Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-818
Taxes; payable in cash, warrants, and coupons.

All municipal taxes and special assessments in the city shall be paid in cash, or in warrants of the city drawn on the fund for which the same is offered; Provided, coupons on any bonds of the city shall be received in payment of taxes or special assessments.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 88, p. 102;

R.S.1913, § 4562;

C.S.1922, § 3949;

C.S.1929, § 15-820;

R.S.1943, § 15-818.